District of Columbia statutes.
25-341.01

Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone” means the area bounded by the line starting at 13th Street, N.W., and Eastern Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Fern Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Fern Street, N.W., to Georgia Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along Georgia Avenue, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Aspen Street, N.W., to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Piney Branch Road, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along Piney Branch Road, N.W., to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Colorado Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southwesterly direction along Colorado Avenue, N.W., to Madison Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Madison Street, N.W., to 16th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 16th Street, N.W., to Spring Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Spring Road, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Randolph Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Randolph Street, N.W. to 10th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 10th Street, N.W., to Spring Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Spring Road, N.W., to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., to 7th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 7th Street, N.W., to Randolph Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Randolph Street, N.W., to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., to Varnum Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Varnum Street, N.W., to Grant Circle, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along the southern circumference of Grant Circle, N.W., to Varnum Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Varnum Street, N.W., to 8th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Ingraham Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Ingraham Street, N.W., to 2nd Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 2nd Street, N.W., to Farragut Street, N.W.; thence in a southeasterly direction along Farragut Street, N.W., to 1st Street, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along 1st Street, N.W., to Gallatin Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Gallatin Street, N.W., to North Capitol Street; thence in a northerly direction along North Capitol Street to Riggs Road, N.E.; thence in an easterly direction along Riggs Road, N.E., to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; thence in a southeasterly direction along South Dakota Avenue, N.E., to Kennedy Street, N.E.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Kennedy Street, N.E., to Madison Street, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Madison Street, N.E., to 6th Street, N.E.; thence in a northeasterly direction along 6th Street, N.E., to Nicholson Street, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Nicholson Street, N.E., to 6th Street, N.E.; thence in a northerly direction along 6th Street, N.E., to Eastern Avenue, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Eastern Avenue, N.E., to New Hampshire Avenue, N.E.; thence in a southwesterly direction along New Hampshire Avenue, N.E. to Blair Road, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Blair Road, N.E., to North Capitol Street; thence in a northwesterly direction along Blair Road, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Aspen Street, N.W., to Willow Street, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Willow Street, N.W., to Eastern Avenue, N.W.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Eastern Avenue, N.W., to the point of beginning at the intersection of 13th Street, N.W., and Eastern Avenue, N.W.; provided, that the Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone shall not include the area bounded by the line starting at the intersection of 8th Street, N.W., and Dahlia Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence easterly along Aspen Street, N.W., to Piney Branch Road, N.W.; thence southwesterly along Piney Branch Road, N.W., to 8th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Madison Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Madison Street, N.W., to 3rd Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 3rd Street, N.W., to Whittier Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Whittier Street, N.W., to 5th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 5th Street, N.W., to Dahlia Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Dahlia Street, N.W., to the point of beginning at the intersection of 13th Street, N.W., and Dahlia Street, N.W.

(b)

Within the Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone, a licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, shall not:

(1)

Divide a manufacturer’s package of more than one container of beer, malt liquor, or ale, to sell an individual container of the package if the capacity of the individual container is 70 ounces or less; or

(2)

Sell, give, offer, expose for sale, or deliver an individual container of beer, malt liquor, or ale with a capacity of 70 ounces or less.

(c)

The Mayor, pursuant to [subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-324, § 2(c), 56 DCR 239
Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-288 added a section to read as follows:
“§ 25-341.01. Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term ‘Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone’ means the area bounded by the line starting at 13th Street, N.W., and Eastern Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Fern Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Fern Street, N.W., to Georgia Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along Georgia Avenue, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Aspen Street, N.W., to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Piney Branch Road, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along Piney Branch Road, N.W., to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Colorado Avenue, N.W.; thence in a southwesterly direction along Colorado Avenue, N.W., to Madison Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Madison Street, N.W., to 16th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 16th Street, N.W., to Spring Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Spring Road, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 13th Street, N.W., to Randolph Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Randolph Street, N.W. to 10th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 10th Street, N.W., to Spring Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Spring Road, N.W., to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., to 7th Street, N.W., thence in a northerly direction along 7th Street, N.W., to Randolph Street, N.W., thence in an easterly direction along Randolph Street, N.W., to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., to Varnum Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Varnum Street, N.W., to Grant Circle, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along the southern circumference of Grant Circle, N.W., to Varnum Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Varnum Street, N.W., to 8th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Ingraham Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Ingraham Street, N.W., to 2nd Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 2nd Street, N.W., to Farragut Street, N.W.; thence in a southeasterly direction along Farragut Street, N.W., to 1st Street, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along 1st Street, N.W., to Gallatin Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Gallatin Street, N.W., to North Capitol Street; thence in a northerly direction along North Capitol Street to Riggs Road, N.E.; thence in an easterly direction along Riggs Road, N.E., to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; thence in a southeasterly direction along South Dakota Avenue, N.E., to Kennedy Street, N.E.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Kennedy Street, N.E., to Madison Street, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Madison Street, N.E., to 6th Street, N.E.; thence in a northeasterly direction along 6th Street, N.E., to Nicholson Street, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Nicholson Street, N.E., to 6th Street, N.E.; thence in a northerly direction along 6th Street, N.E., to Eastern Avenue, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Eastern Avenue, N.E., to New Hampshire Avenue, N.E.; thence in a southwesterly direction along New Hampshire Avenue, N.E. to Blair Road, N.E.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Blair Road, N.E., to North Capitol Street; thence in a northwesterly direction along Blair Road, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Aspen Street, N.W., to Willow Street, N.W.; thence in a northeasterly direction along Willow Street, N.W., to Eastern Avenue, N.W.; thence in a northwesterly direction along Eastern Avenue, N.W., to the point of beginning at the intersection of 13th Street, N.W., and Eastern Avenue, N.W.; provided, that the Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone shall not include the area bounded by the line starting at the intersection of 8th Street, N.W., and Dahlia Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Aspen Street, N.W.; thence easterly along Aspen Street, N.W., to Piney Branch Road, N.W.; thence southwesterly along Piney Branch Road, N.W., to 8th Street, N.W.; thence in a southerly direction along 8th Street, N.W., to Madison Street, N.W.; thence in an easterly direction along Madison Street, N.W., to 3rd Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 3rd Street, N.W., to Whittier Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Whittier Street, N.W., to 5th Street, N.W.; thence in a northerly direction along 5th Street, N.W., to Dahlia Street, N.W.; thence in a westerly direction along Dahlia Street, N.W., to the point of beginning at the intersection of 13th Street, N.W., and Dahlia Street, N.W.
“(b) Within the Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone, a licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, shall not:
“(1) Divide a manufacturer’s package of more than one container of beer, malt liquor, or ale, to sell an individual container of the package if the capacity of the individual container is 70 ounces or less; or
“(2) Sell, give, offer, expose for sale, or deliver an individual container of beer, malt liquor, or ale with a capacity of 70 ounces or less.”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 17-288 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Targeted Ward 4 Single Sales Moratorium Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-509, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10878).